Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Chapter 9. Campaign Finance Disclosure Act.

§§ 24.2-900 through 24.2-930.

Repealed by Acts 2006, cc. 787 and 892.

Cross references.

For current provisions, see Campaign Finance Disclosure Act of 2006, Chapter 9.3 (§

24.2-945

et seq.) of Title 24.2.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, cc. 787 and 892 repealed former Chapter 9 (§

24.2-900

et seq.) and recodified it as Chapter 9.3 (§

24.2-945

et seq.) of Title 24.2.